Washington statutes.
RCW 43.376.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Indian tribe" means any federally recognized Indian tribe whose traditional lands and territories included parts of Washington.

(2) "State agency" means an agency, department, office, or the office of a statewide elected official, of the state of Washington.

[ 2012 c 122 s 1.]